Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB576.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 100 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "accessory dwelling unit" means a self-contained living
unit on the same parcel as a single-family home that:
(a) Includes its own cooking, sleeping, and sanitation facilities;
(b) Meets all applicable state or local codes or regulations for dwelling units,
including building, fire, and sanitation codes; and
(c) Has:
1. Less square footage than the single-family home, if it is internal to the
single-family home; or
2. Seventy-five percent (75%) or less square footage than the single-
family home, if it is attached to or detached from the single-family
home.
(2) Accessory dwelling units shall be considered a permitted use in all residential
zones and shall not be subject to permitting or review under this chapter.
(3) A planning unit shall not adopt or enforce any regulation or ordinance that:
(a) Prohibits a property owner from having one (1) accessory dwelling unit on
the owner's property;
(b) Imposes requirements on accessory dwelling units that are more restrictive
than those placed on single-family homes, including but not limited to:
1. Parking requirements;
2. Architectural or design standards;
3. Lot size, building height, or setback requirements; or
4. Any requirement that an owner occupy the single-family home or the
accessory dwelling unit, or have any specific relationship to a person
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/11/2025 12:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1104
occupying the single-family home or accessory dwelling unit; or
(c) Assesses any fees in addition to those required for single-family homes,
other than the fee set out in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) A planning unit may adopt or enforce a regulation or ordinance that:
(a) Requires the owner of an accessory dwelling unit to notify the planning unit
prior to the construction or creation of a new accessory dwelling unit;
(b) Assesses a one (1) time fee of not more than two hundred fifty dollars
($250) at the time the accessory dwelling unit is constructed or created;
(c) Prohibits or restricts an accessory dwelling unit from being rented for terms
of less than thirty (30) days; or
(d) Prohibits a property owner from having more than one (1) accessory
dwelling unit on a property.
(5) This section shall not be construed to prohibit a planning unit from adopting or
enforcing ordinances or regulations that are generally applicable to all dwelling
units.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/11/2025 12:27 PM Jacketed